Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-838
Boundary bridge; bonds; special election; notice; conduct.

The notice required by section 39-837 shall contain the conditions upon which bonds are to be issued and which are required by section 39-837 to be set forth in the petition, and shall be published for at least thirty days prior to such election in some newspaper published in such county, township, precinct, city or village, if any newspaper is published therein; and if no newspaper is published therein, such notice shall be published by posting notice at the courthouse door in the county and in every voting precinct in the county. In case of a township, precinct, city or village election, such notice, where there is no newspaper published therein, shall be published by posting the notice in at least four public places in each township, precinct, city or village for at least thirty days next preceding the day of holding such election. The election in all other respects shall be governed by and conform to the laws regulating general elections.

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 3, p. 188;

R.S.1913, § 2998;

C.S.1922, § 2750;

C.S.1929, § 39-836;

R.S.1943, § 39-838.